Washington statutes.
RCW 39.90.020

Validation of bonds, proceedings for issuance, sales, etc.

All bonds heretofore issued for the purpose of financing or aiding in the financing of any work, undertaking, or project by any public body, including all proceedings for the authorization and issuance of such bonds, and the sale, execution, and delivery thereof, are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power (other than constitutional) of such public body, or the governing body or commission or officers thereof, to authorize and issue such bonds, or to sell, execute, or deliver the same, and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities (other than constitutional), including the failure to publish notices of elections, in such proceedings, or in such sale, execution or delivery, and notwithstanding that such governing body or commission or officers may not have been elected, appointed or qualified for the offices they purported to hold; and such bonds are and shall be binding, legal, valid, and enforceable obligations of such public body.

[ 1947 c 242 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5616-21.]